Utah statutes.
9-9-104.5.   Meetings with tribal leaders and Indian groups.
(1)  The division shall meet regularly with:
(a)  elected officials of Indian tribes located in whole or in part in the
state; or
(b)  individuals designated by elected officials of the tribes described in
Subsection (1)(a).
(2) (a)  Subject to Section 9-9-104.6, at least five times each year, the
division shall coordinate and attend a joint meeting of the representatives of
tribal governments listed in Subsection (2)(b) for the purpose of coordinating
the efforts of state and tribal governments in meeting the needs of the Native
Americans residing in the state.
(b) (i)  The representatives to be included in the meeting described in
Subsection (2)(a) shall be selected as follows:
(A)  an elected official of the Navajo Nation that resides in San Juan County
selected by the Navajo Nation government;
(B)  an elected official of the Ute Indian Tribe of the Uintah and Ouray
Reservation selected by the Uintah and Ouray Tribal Business Committee;
(C)  an elected official of the Paiute Indian Tribe of Utah selected by the
Paiute Indian Tribe of Utah Tribal Council;
(D)  an elected official of the Northwestern Band of the Shoshoni Nation that
resides in Northern Utah selected by the Northwestern Band of the Shoshoni
Nation Tribal Council;
(E)  an elected official of the Confederate Tribes of Goshute Reservation that
resides in Ibapah selected by the Goshute Business Council;
(F)  an elected official of the Skull Valley Band of Goshute Indians selected
by the Goshute Indian Tribal Executive Committee;
(G)  an elected official of the Ute Mountain Ute Tribe that resides in Utah
selected by the Ute Mountain Ute Tribal Council; and
(H)  an elected official of the San Juan Southern Paiute Tribe selected by the
San Juan Southern Paiute Tribal Council.
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(b)(i), if an elected official of an
Indian tribe provides notice to the division, the Indian tribe may designate
an individual other than the elected official selected under Subsection
(2)(b)(i) to represent the Indian tribe at a meeting held under Subsection
(2)(a).
(c) (i)  A meeting held in accordance with Subsection (2)(a) is subject to
Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.
(ii)  A meeting of representatives listed in Subsection (2)(b) is not subject
to the requirements of Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act,
notwithstanding whether it is held on the same day as a meeting held in
accordance with Subsection (2)(a) if:
(A)  the division does not coordinate the meeting described in this Subsection
(2)(c)(ii);
(B)  no state agency participates in the meeting described in this Subsection
(2)(c)(ii);
(C)  a representative receives no per diem or expenses under this section for
attending the meeting described in this Subsection (2)(c)(ii) that is in
addition to any per diem or expenses the representative receives under
Subsection (2)(d) for attending a meeting described in Subsection (2)(a); and
(D)  the meeting described in this Subsection (2)(c)(ii) is not held:
(I)  after a meeting described in Subsection (2)(a) begins; and
(II)  before the meeting described in Subsection (2)(c)(ii)(D)(I) adjourns.
(d)  A representative of a tribal government that attends a meeting held in
accordance with Subsection (2)(a) may not receive compensation or benefits for
the representative's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in
accordance with:
(i)  Section 63A-3-106;
(ii)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(iii)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106
and 63A-3-107.
(e)  For each meeting, only one individual from each tribe may receive per
diem and expenses, as provided in this Subsection (2)(d).
(3)  The division may meet as necessary with Indian groups other than tribal
governments representing the interests of Native Americans who are citizens of
the state residing on or off reservation land.
